Massachusetts, session 194th, H4020.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as amended by section 8 of chapter 150 of
the acts of 2024, is hereby amened by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
No zoning ordinance or by-law shall prohibit, unreasonably restrict or require a special
permit or other discretionary zoning approval for the use of land or structures for a single
accessory dwelling unit, or the rental thereof, in a single-family residential zoning district;
provided, that the use of land or structures for such accessory dwelling unit under this paragraph
may be subject to reasonable regulations, including, but not limited to, 310 CMR 15.000 et seq.,
if applicable, site plan review, regulations concerning dimensional setbacks and the bulk and
height of structures and may be subject to restrictions and prohibitions on short-term rental, as
defined in section 1 of chapter 64G. The use of land or structures for an accessory dwelling unit
under this paragraph shall not require owner occupancy of either the accessory dwelling unit or
of 2

the principal dwelling; provided, that not more than 1 additional parking space shall be required
for an accessory dwelling unit; provided further, that no additional parking space shall be
required for an accessory dwelling located not more than 0.5 miles from a commuter rail station,
subway station, ferry terminal or bus station; and provided further, that the accessory dwelling
unit is primarily utilized as a secondary residential unit within the same property for use by the
owner or family members and to promote affordable housing, community well-being and prevent
speculative investment in residential properties. For more than 1 accessory dwelling unit, or
rental thereof, in a single-family residential zoning district there shall be a special permit for the
use of land or structures for an accessory dwelling unit. The executive office of housing and
livable communities may issue guidelines or promulgate regulations to administer this paragraph.
of 2